Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5534.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1. Each legislative session, a department or agency in the executive branch of government of this state shall, not later than 90 days after the date that the legislative session begins, submit to the legislature recommendations on ways to reduce the regulatory burden of the department or agency.